Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.200

Agent for absentee distributee.

When any estate has been or is about to be distributed by decree of the court as provided in this chapter, to any person who has not been located, the court shall appoint an agent for the purpose of representing the interests of such person and of taking possession and charge of said estate for the benefit of such absentee person: PROVIDED, That no public official may be appointed as agent under this section.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.76.200. Prior: 1955 ex.s. c 7 s 1; 1917 c 156 s 165; RRS s 1535.]